North Dakota statutes. TITLE 59 Trusts
CHAPTER 59-04.2 Uniform Principal and Income Act
59-04.2-19. (411)
Minerals, water, and other natural resources.

To the extent that a trustee accounts for receipts from an interest in minerals or other natural resources pursuant to this section, the trustee shall allocate them as follows:

If received as nominal delay rental or nominal annual rent on a lease, a receipt must be allocated to income.

If received from a production payment, a receipt must be allocated to income if and to the extent that the agreement creating the production payment provides a factor for interest or its equivalent. The balance must be allocated to principal.

If an amount received as a royalty, shut-in-well payment, take-or-pay payment, bonus, or delay rental is more than nominal, fifteen percent must be allocated to principal and the balance to income.

If an amount is received from a working interest or any other interest not provided for in subdivision a, b, or c, fifteen percent of the net amount received must be allocated to principal and the balance to income.

An amount received on account of an interest in water that is renewable must be allocated to income. If the water is not renewable, ninety percent of the amount must be allocated to principal and the balance to income.

This chapter applies whether or not a decedent or donor was extracting minerals, water, or other natural resources before the interest became subject to the trust.

If a trust has not received receipts from an interest in minerals, water, or other natural resources before August 1, 2015, the trustee shall allocate receipts from interests in minerals, water, or other natural resources as provided in this section.

If a trust has received receipts from an interest in minerals, water, or other natural resources before August 1, 2015, the trustee shall allocate receipts from interests in minerals, water, or other natural resources as follows:

If the trust acquired an interest in minerals, water, or other natural resources before August 1, 1999, the trustee may allocate receipts in the manner used by the trustee before August 1, 1999, or as required by law in effect on August 1, 1999.

If the trust acquired an interest in minerals, water, or other natural resources after August 1, 1999, and before August 1, 2015, the trustee shall allocate receipts in the manner required by law in effect on August 1, 1999.

The trustee may petition the court to permanently modify the manner used to allocate receipts under this section. In deciding whether and to what extent to modify the manner used to allocate receipts, the court may consider any factors relevant to the trust and its beneficiaries; including the following factors to the extent they are relevant:

The nature, purpose, and expected duration of the trust;

The intent of the settlor;

The identity and circumstances of the beneficiaries;

The need for liquidity, regularity of income, and preservation and appreciation of capital;

The assets held in the trust; the extent to which they consist of financial assets, interests in closely held enterprises, tangible and intangible personal property, or real property; the extent to which an asset is used by a beneficiary; and whether an asset was purchased by the trustee or received from the settlor;

The net amount allocated to income under the other sections of this chapter and the increase or decrease in the value of the principal assets;

Whether and to what extent the terms of the trust give the trustee the power to invade principal or accumulate income or prohibit the trustee from invading principal or accumulating income, and the extent to which the trustee has exercised a power from time to time to invade principal or accumulate income;

The actual and anticipated effect of economic conditions on principal and income and effects of inflation and deflation; and

The anticipated tax consequences of a modification.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 532, § 1; 2015, ch. 468, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.

59-04.2-20. (412)
Timber.

To the extent that a trustee accounts for receipts from the sale of timber and related products pursuant to this section, the trustee shall allocate the net receipts:

To income to the extent that the amount of timber removed from the land does not exceed the rate of growth of the timber during the accounting periods in which a beneficiary has a mandatory income interest;

To principal to the extent that the amount of timber removed from the land exceeds the rate of growth of the timber or the net receipts are from the sale of standing timber;

To or between income and principal if the net receipts are from the lease of timberland or from a contract to cut timber from land owned by a trust, by determining the amount of timber removed from the land under the lease or contract and applying the rules in subdivisions a and b; or

To principal to the extent that advance payments, bonuses, and other payments are not allocated pursuant to subdivision a, b, or c.

In determining net receipts to be allocated pursuant to subsection 1, a trustee shall deduct and transfer to principal a reasonable amount for depletion.

This chapter applies whether or not a decedent or transferor was harvesting timber from the property before it became subject to the trust.

If a trust owns an interest in timberland on August 1, 1999, the trustee may allocate net receipts from the sale of timber and related products as provided in this chapter or in the manner used by the trustee before August 1, 1999. If the trust acquires an interest in timberland after August 1, 1999, the trustee shall allocate net receipts from the sale of timber and related products as provided in this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 532, § 1.

59-04.2-21. (413)
Property not productive of income.

Reserved.

59-04.2-22. (414)
Derivatives and options.

In this section, “derivative” means a contract or financial instrument or a combination of contracts and financial instruments which gives a trust the right or obligation to participate in some or all changes in the price of a tangible or intangible asset or group of assets, or changes in a rate, an index of prices or rates, or other market indicator for an asset or a group of assets.

To the extent that a trustee does not account under section 59-04.2-11 for transactions in derivatives, the trustee shall allocate to principal receipts from and disbursements made in connection with those transactions.

If a trustee grants an option to buy property from the trust, whether or not the trust owns the property when the option is granted, grants an option that permits another person to sell property to the trust, or acquires an option to buy property for the trust or an option to sell an asset owned by the trust, and the trustee or other owner of the asset is required to deliver the asset if the option is exercised, an amount received for granting the option must be allocated to principal. An amount paid to acquire the option must be paid from principal. A gain or loss realized upon the exercise of an option, including an option granted to a settlor of the trust for services rendered, must be allocated to principal.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 532, § 1.

59-04.2-23. (415)
Asset-backed securities.

In this section, “asset-backed security” means an asset whose value is based upon the right it gives the owner to receive distributions from the proceeds of financial assets that provide collateral for the security. The term includes an asset that gives the owner the right to receive from the collateral financial assets only the interest or other current return or only the proceeds other than interest or current return. The term does not include an asset to which section 59-04.2-09 or 59-04.2-17 applies.

If a trust receives a payment from interest or other current return and from other proceeds of the collateral financial assets, the trustee shall allocate to income the portion of the payment which the payer identifies as being from interest or other current return and shall allocate the balance of the payment to principal.

If a trust receives one or more payments in exchange for the trust’s entire interest in an asset-backed security in one accounting period, the trustee shall allocate the payments to principal. If a payment is one of a series of payments that will result in the liquidation of the trust’s interest in the security over more than one accounting period, the trustee shall allocate ten percent of the payment to income and the balance to principal.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 532, § 1.

59-04.2-24. (501)
Disbursements from income.

A trustee shall make the following disbursements from income to the extent that they are not disbursements to which subdivision b or c of subsection 2 of section 59-04.2-04 applies:

One-half of the regular compensation of the trustee and of any person providing investment advisory or custodial services to the trustee.

One-half of all expenses for accountings, judicial proceedings, or other matters that involve both the income and remainder interests.

All of the other ordinary expenses incurred in connection with the administration, management, or preservation of trust property and the distribution of income, including interest, ordinary repairs, regularly recurring taxes assessed against principal, and expenses of a proceeding or other matter that concerns primarily the income interest.

Recurring premiums on insurance covering the loss of a principal asset or the loss of income from or use of the asset.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 532, § 1.

59-04.2-25. (502)
Disbursements from principal.

A trustee shall make the following disbursements from principal:

The remaining one-half of the disbursements described in subsections 1 and 2 of section 59-04.2-24;

All of the trustee’s compensation calculated on principal as a fee for acceptance, distribution, or termination, and disbursements made to prepare property for sale;

Payments on the principal of a trust debt;

Expenses of a proceeding that concerns primarily principal, including a proceeding to construe the trust or to protect the trust or its property;

Premiums paid on a policy of insurance not described in subsection 4 of section 59-04.2-24 of which the trust is the owner and beneficiary;

Estate, inheritance, and other transfer taxes, including penalties, apportioned to the trust; and

Disbursements related to environmental matters, including reclamation, assessing environmental conditions, remedying and removing environmental contamination, monitoring remedial activities and the release of substances, preventing future releases of substances, collecting amounts from persons liable or potentially liable for the costs of those activities, penalties imposed under environmental laws or regulations and other payments made to comply with those laws or regulations, statutory or common-law claims by third parties, and defending claims based on environmental matters.

If a principal asset is encumbered with an obligation that requires income from that asset to be paid directly to the creditor, the trustee shall transfer from principal to income an amount equal to the income paid to the creditor in reduction of the principal balance of the obligation.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 532, § 1.

59-04.2-26. (503)
Transfers from income to principal for depreciation.

In this section, “depreciation” means a reduction in value due to wear, tear, decay, corrosion, or gradual obsolescence of a fixed asset having a useful life of more than one year.

A trustee may transfer to principal a reasonable amount of the net cash receipts from a principal asset that is subject to depreciation, but may not transfer any amount for depreciation:

Of that portion of real property used or available for use by a beneficiary as a residence or of tangible personal property held or made available for the personal use or enjoyment of a beneficiary;

During the administration of a decedent’s estate; or

Under this section if the trustee is accounting under section 59-04.2-11 for the business or activity in which the asset is used.

An amount transferred to principal need not be held as a separate fund.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 532, § 1.

59-04.2-27. (504)
Transfers from income to reimburse principal.

If a trustee makes or expects to make a principal disbursement described in this section, the trustee may transfer an appropriate amount from income to principal in one or more accounting periods to reimburse principal or to provide a reserve for future principal disbursements.

Principal disbursements to which subsection 1 applies include the following, but only to the extent that the trustee has not been and does not expect to be reimbursed by a third party:

An amount chargeable to income but paid from principal because it is unusually large, including extraordinary repairs;

A capital improvement to a principal asset, whether in the form of changes to an existing asset or the construction of a new asset, including special assessments;

Disbursements made to prepare property for rental, including tenant allowances, leasehold improvements, and broker’s commissions;

Periodic payments on an obligation secured by a principal asset to the extent that the amount transferred from income to principal for depreciation is less than the periodic payments; and

Disbursements described in subdivision g of subsection 1 of section 59-04.2-25.

If the asset whose ownership gives rise to the disbursements becomes subject to a successive income interest after an income interest ends, a trustee may continue to transfer amounts from income to principal as provided in subsection 1.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 532, § 1.

59-04.2-28. (505)
Income taxes.

A tax required to be paid by a trustee based on receipts allocated to income must be paid from income.

A tax required to be paid by a trustee based on receipts allocated to principal must be paid from principal, even if the tax is called an income tax by the taxing authority.

A tax required to be paid by a trustee on the trust’s share of an entity’s taxable income must be paid:

From income to the extent that receipts from the entity are allocated to income;

From principal to the extent that receipts from the entity are allocated only to principal;

Proportionately from principal and income to the extent that receipts from the entity are allocated to both income and principal; and

From principal to the extent that the tax exceeds the total receipts from the entity.

After applying subsections 1 through 3, the trustee shall adjust income or principal receipts to the extent that the trust’s taxes are reduced because the trust receives a deduction for payments made to a beneficiary.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 532, § 1; 2009, ch. 586, § 2.

59-04.2-29. (506)
Adjustments between principal and income because of taxes.

A fiduciary may make adjustments between principal and income to offset the shifting of economic interests or tax benefits between income beneficiaries and remainder beneficiaries which arise from:

Elections and decisions, other than those described in subsection 2, that the fiduciary makes from time to time regarding tax matters;

An income tax or any other tax that is imposed upon the fiduciary or a beneficiary as a result of a transaction involving or a distribution from the estate or trust; or

The ownership by an estate or trust of an interest in an entity whose taxable income, whether or not distributed, is includable in the taxable income of the estate, trust, or a beneficiary.

If the amount of an estate tax marital deduction or charitable contribution deduction is reduced because a fiduciary deducts an amount paid from principal for income tax purposes instead of deducting it for estate tax purposes, and as a result estate taxes paid from principal are increased and income taxes paid by an estate, trust, or beneficiary are decreased, each estate, trust, or beneficiary that benefits from the decrease in income tax shall reimburse the principal from which the increase in estate tax is paid. The total reimbursement must equal the increase in the estate tax to the extent that the principal used to pay the increase would have qualified for a marital deduction or charitable contribution deduction but for the payment. The proportionate share of the reimbursement for each estate, trust, or beneficiary whose income taxes are reduced must be the same as its proportionate share of the total decrease in income tax. An estate or trust shall reimburse principal from income.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 532, § 1.

59-04.2-30.
Certain charitable remainder unitrusts.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, unless the trust instrument directs otherwise, an increase in the value of the obligations described in this subsection owned by a charitable remainder unitrust of the type authorized in section 664(d)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code [26 U.S.C. 664(d)(3)] or its successor provisions is distributable as income when it becomes available for distribution:

A zero coupon bond;

An annuity contract before annuitization;

A life insurance contract before the death of the insured;

An interest in a common trust fund as defined in section 584 of the Internal Revenue Code [26 U.S.C. 584] or its successor provisions;

An interest in a partnership as defined in section 7701 of the Internal Revenue Code [26 U.S.C. 7701] or its successor provisions; and

Any other obligation for the payment of money that is payable at a future time in accordance with a fixed, variable, or discretionary schedule of appreciation in excess of the price at which it was issued.

The increase in value of the obligations described in subsection 1 is distributable to the beneficiary who was the income beneficiary at the time of the increase.

For purposes of this section, the increase in value of an obligation described in subsection 1 is available for distribution only when the trustee receives cash on account of the obligation. If the obligation is surrendered or liquidated partially, the cash available must be attributed first to the increase.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 532, § 1.